Utah statutes.
4-7-13.5.   Suspension of license -- Opportunity for hearing.

(1)  A license may be suspended immediately if:

(a)  an emergency exists which presents a clear and present danger to the public health;

(b)  an inspection or sampling is refused; or

(c)  the licensee's bond has been revoked or cancelled.

(2)  The department shall immediately notify the person of the suspension in writing and provide an opportunity for hearing without delay.

